app/knowledge_base/resources/dictionary.aff
PFX P1 Y 1
PFX P1 0 gag gab



REP a aa 
REP aa a 
REP bt bd 
REP c ch 
REP ch c 
REP ct cc 
REP d dh 
REP dh d
REP dhn n 
REP dhs ch 
REP dht t 
REP ds ch 
REP dt dd 
REP e ee 
REP ee e 
REP f ph 
REP gt gd 
REP i ii 
REP ii i 
REP jt jj 
REP ln ll
REP ls ch 
REP n ny 
REP ny n 
REP o oo 
REP oo o 
REP ph f 
REP rn rr 
REP sn fn
REP st ft 
REP tdh dh 
REP tn nn 
REP u uu 
REP uu u 
REP xs cc 
REP xt xx 






SFX V1 Y 73
SFX V1 0 ne k
SFX V1 0 na k
SFX V1 0 nu k
SFX V1 0 ni k
SFX V1 0 ta k
SFX V1 0 tani k
SFX V1 0 taniittu k
SFX V1 0 te k
SFX V1 0 teetta k
SFX V1 0 ti k
SFX V1 0 tu k
SFX V1 0 tuu k
SFX V1 0 sisa k
SFX V1 0 sisan k
SFX V1 0 sise k
SFX V1 0 siste k
SFX V1 0 sisna k
SFX V1 0 sistu k
SFX V1 0 sisne k
SFX V1 0 a k
SFX V1 0 achuu k
SFX V1 0 achuuf k
SFX V1 0 adha k
SFX V1 0 adhe k
SFX V1 0 adhu k
SFX V1 0 ama k
SFX V1 0 amaa k
SFX V1 0 aman k
SFX V1 0 amne k
SFX V1 0 amoo k
SFX V1 0 amta k
SFX V1 0 amtan k
SFX V1 0 amte k
SFX V1 0 amti k
SFX V1 0 amtu k
SFX V1 0 amuuf k
SFX V1 0 ani k
SFX V1 0 e k
SFX V1 0 eera k
SFX V1 0 i k
SFX V1 0 uu k
SFX V1 0 uuf k
SFX V1 0 neerra k
SFX V1 0 aaf k
SFX V1 0 aas k
SFX V1 0 aatu k
SFX V1 0 uuttan k
SFX V1 0 uutti k
SFX V1 0 aa k
SFX V1 0 naan k
SFX V1 0 u k
SFX V1 0 eeti k
SFX V1 0 ees k
SFX V1 0 is k
SFX V1 0 uufan k
SFX V1 0 uufi k
SFX V1 0 uufii k
SFX V1 0 adhuu k
SFX V1 0 adhe k
SFX V1 0 amani k
SFX V1 0 ame k
SFX V1 0 amni k
SFX V1 0 amu k
SFX V1 0 amtu k
SFX V1 0 amtani k
SFX V1 0 amuu k
SFX V1 0 amuudha k
SFX V1 0 amuudhaaf k
SFX V1 0 amuun k
SFX V1 0 ullee k
SFX V1 0 aatii k
SFX V1 0 umsa k
SFX V1 0 iisa k
SFX V1 0 iinsa k
SFX V1 0 sisuu k



SFX V1 Y 73
SFX V1 0 ne f
SFX V1 0 na f
SFX V1 0 nu f
SFX V1 0 ta f
SFX V1 0 tani f
SFX V1 0 taniittu f
SFX V1 0 te f
SFX V1 0 teetta f
SFX V1 0 ti f
SFX V1 0 tu f
SFX V1 0 tuu f
SFX V1 0 sisa f
SFX V1 0 sisan f
SFX V1 0 sise f
SFX V1 0 siste f
SFX V1 0 sisna f
SFX V1 0 sistu f
SFX V1 0 sisne f
SFX V1 0 a f
SFX V1 0 achuu f
SFX V1 0 achuuf f
SFX V1 0 adha f
SFX V1 0 adhe f
SFX V1 0 adhu f
SFX V1 0 ama f
SFX V1 0 amaa f
SFX V1 0 aman f
SFX V1 0 amne f
SFX V1 0 amoo f
SFX V1 0 amta f
SFX V1 0 amtan f
SFX V1 0 amte f
SFX V1 0 amti f
SFX V1 0 amtu f
SFX V1 0 amuuf f
SFX V1 0 ani f
SFX V1 0 e f
SFX V1 0 eera f
SFX V1 0 i f
SFX V1 0 uu f
SFX V1 0 uuf f
SFX V1 0 neerra f
SFX V1 0 aaf f
SFX V1 0 aas f
SFX V1 0 aatu f
SFX V1 0 uuttan f
SFX V1 0 uutti f
SFX V1 0 aa f
SFX V1 0 naan f
SFX V1 0 u f
SFX V1 0 eeti f
SFX V1 0 ees f
SFX V1 0 is f
SFX V1 0 uufan f
SFX V1 0 uufi f
SFX V1 0 uufii f
SFX V1 0 adhuu f
SFX V1 0 adhe f
SFX V1 0 amani f
SFX V1 0 ame f
SFX V1 0 amni f
SFX V1 0 amu f
SFX V1 0 amtu f
SFX V1 0 amtani f
SFX V1 0 amuu f
SFX V1 0 amuudha f
SFX V1 0 amuudhaaf f
SFX V1 0 amuun f
SFX V1 0 ullee f
SFX V1 0 aatii f
SFX V1 0 umsa f
SFX V1 0 iisa f
SFX V1 0 iinsa f


SFX V1 Y 73
SFX V1 0 ne m
SFX V1 0 na m
SFX V1 0 nu m
SFX V1 0 ta m
SFX V1 0 tani m
SFX V1 0 taniittu m
SFX V1 0 te m
SFX V1 0 teetta m
SFX V1 0 ti m
SFX V1 0 tu m
SFX V1 0 tuu m
SFX V1 0 sisa m
SFX V1 0 sisan m
SFX V1 0 sise m
SFX V1 0 siste m
SFX V1 0 sisna m
SFX V1 0 sistu m
SFX V1 0 sisne m
SFX V1 0 a m
SFX V1 0 achuu m
SFX V1 0 achuuf m
SFX V1 0 adha m
SFX V1 0 adhe m
SFX V1 0 adhu m
SFX V1 0 ama m
SFX V1 0 amaa m
SFX V1 0 aman m
SFX V1 0 amne m
SFX V1 0 amoo m
SFX V1 0 amta m
SFX V1 0 amtan m
SFX V1 0 amte m
SFX V1 0 amti m
SFX V1 0 amtu m
SFX V1 0 amuuf m
SFX V1 0 ani m
SFX V1 0 e m
SFX V1 0 eera m
SFX V1 0 i m
SFX V1 0 uu m
SFX V1 0 uuf m
SFX V1 0 neerra m
SFX V1 0 aaf m
SFX V1 0 aas m
SFX V1 0 aatu m
SFX V1 0 uuttan m
SFX V1 0 uutti m
SFX V1 0 aa m
SFX V1 0 naan m
SFX V1 0 u m
SFX V1 0 eeti m
SFX V1 0 ees m
SFX V1 0 is m
SFX V1 0 uufan m
SFX V1 0 uufi m
SFX V1 0 uufii m
SFX V1 0 adhuu m
SFX V1 0 adhe m
SFX V1 0 amani m
SFX V1 0 ame m
SFX V1 0 amni m
SFX V1 0 amu m
SFX V1 0 amtu m
SFX V1 0 amtani m
SFX V1 0 amuu m
SFX V1 0 amuudha m
SFX V1 0 amuudhaaf m
SFX V1 0 amuun m
SFX V1 0 ullee m
SFX V1 0 aatii m
SFX V1 0 umsa m
SFX V1 0 iisa m
SFX V1 0 iinsa m



SFX V1 Y 73
SFX V1 0 ne n
SFX V1 0 na n
SFX V1 0 nu n
SFX V1 0 ta n
SFX V1 0 tani n
SFX V1 0 taniittu n
SFX V1 0 te n
SFX V1 0 teetta n
SFX V1 0 ti n
SFX V1 0 tu n
SFX V1 0 tuu n
SFX V1 0 sisa n
SFX V1 0 sisan n
SFX V1 0 sise n
SFX V1 0 siste n
SFX V1 0 sisna n
SFX V1 0 sistu n
SFX V1 0 sisne n
SFX V1 0 a n
SFX V1 0 achuu n
SFX V1 0 achuuf n
SFX V1 0 adha n
SFX V1 0 adhe n
SFX V1 0 adhu n
SFX V1 0 ama n
SFX V1 0 amaa n
SFX V1 0 aman n
SFX V1 0 amne n
SFX V1 0 amoo n
SFX V1 0 amta n
SFX V1 0 amtan n
SFX V1 0 amte n
SFX V1 0 amti n
SFX V1 0 amtu n
SFX V1 0 amuuf n
SFX V1 0 ani n
SFX V1 0 e n
SFX V1 0 eera n
SFX V1 0 i n
SFX V1 0 uu n
SFX V1 0 uuf n
SFX V1 0 neerra n
SFX V1 0 aaf n
SFX V1 0 aas n
SFX V1 0 aatu n
SFX V1 0 uuttan n
SFX V1 0 uutti n
SFX V1 0 aa n
SFX V1 0 naan n
SFX V1 0 u n
SFX V1 0 eeti n
SFX V1 0 ees n
SFX V1 0 is n
SFX V1 0 uufan n
SFX V1 0 uufi n
SFX V1 0 uufii n
SFX V1 0 adhuu n
SFX V1 0 adhe n
SFX V1 0 amani n
SFX V1 0 ame n
SFX V1 0 amni n
SFX V1 0 amu n
SFX V1 0 amtu n
SFX V1 0 amtani n
SFX V1 0 amuu n
SFX V1 0 amuudha n
SFX V1 0 amuudhaaf n
SFX V1 0 amuun n
SFX V1 0 ullee n
SFX V1 0 aatii n
SFX V1 0 umsa n
SFX V1 0 iisa n
SFX V1 0 iinsa n


SFX V2 Y 79
SFX V2 0 achise dh
SFX V2 0 achisa dh
SFX V2 0 achisan dh
SFX V2 0 achiste dh
SFX V2 0 achisna dh
SFX V2 0 achistan dh
SFX V2 0 anna dh
SFX V2 0 anne dh
SFX V2 0 annu dh
SFX V2 0 ata dh
SFX V2 0 atani dh
SFX V2 0 ate dh
SFX V2 0 atte dh
SFX V2 0 attu dh
SFX V2 0 attan dh
SFX V2 0 atu dh
SFX V2 0 ta dh
SFX V2 0 tani dh
SFX V2 0 taniittu dh
SFX V2 0 te dh
SFX V2 0 teetta dh
SFX V2 0 ti dh
SFX V2 0 tu dh
SFX V2 0 tuu dh
SFX V2 0 a dh
SFX V2 0 achuu dh
SFX V2 0 achuuf dh
SFX V2 0 adha dh
SFX V2 0 adhe dh
SFX V2 0 adhu dh
SFX V2 0 ama dh
SFX V2 0 amaa dh
SFX V2 0 aman dh
SFX V2 0 amne dh
SFX V2 0 amoo dh
SFX V2 0 amta dh
SFX V2 0 amtan dh
SFX V2 0 amte dh
SFX V2 0 amti dh
SFX V2 0 amtu dh
SFX V2 0 amuuf dh
SFX V2 0 ani dh
SFX V2 0 e dh
SFX V2 0 eera dh
SFX V2 0 i dh
SFX V2 0 uu dh
SFX V2 0 uuf dh
SFX V2 0 neerra dh
SFX V2 0 aaf dh
SFX V2 0 aas dh
SFX V2 0 aatu dh
SFX V2 0 uuttan dh
SFX V2 0 uutti dh
SFX V2 0 aa dh
SFX V2 0 naan dh
SFX V2 0 u dh
SFX V2 0 eeti dh
SFX V2 0 ees dh
SFX V2 0 is dh
SFX V2 0 uufan dh
SFX V2 0 uufi dh
SFX V2 0 uufii dh
SFX V2 0 adhuu dh
SFX V2 0 adhe dh
SFX V2 0 amani dh
SFX V2 0 ame dh
SFX V2 0 amni dh
SFX V2 0 amu dh
SFX V2 0 amtu dh
SFX V2 0 amtani dh
SFX V2 0 amuu dh
SFX V2 0 amuudha dh
SFX V2 0 amuudhaaf dh
SFX V2 0 amuun dh
SFX V2 0 ullee dh
SFX V2 0 aatii dh
SFX V2 0 umsa dh
SFX V2 0 iisa dh
SFX V2 0 iinsa dh

SFX V2 Y 77
SFX V2 0 achise h
SFX V2 0 achisan h
SFX V2 0 achistan h
SFX V2 0 aniiru h
SFX V2 0 anna h
SFX V2 0 anne h
SFX V2 0 annu h
SFX V2 0 ata h
SFX V2 0 atani h
SFX V2 0 ate h
SFX V2 0 atine h
SFX V2 0 atte h
SFX V2 0 attan h
SFX V2 0 achise h
SFX V2 0 ta h
SFX V2 0 tani h
SFX V2 0 taniittu h
SFX V2 0 te h
SFX V2 0 teetta h
SFX V2 0 ti h
SFX V2 0 tu h
SFX V2 0 tuu h
SFX V2 0 a h
SFX V2 0 achuu h
SFX V2 0 achuuf h
SFX V2 0 adha h
SFX V2 0 adhe h
SFX V2 0 adhu h
SFX V2 0 ama h
SFX V2 0 amaa h
SFX V2 0 aman h
SFX V2 0 amne h
SFX V2 0 amoo h
SFX V2 0 amta h
SFX V2 0 amtan h
SFX V2 0 amte h
SFX V2 0 amti h
SFX V2 0 amtu h
SFX V2 0 amuuf h
SFX V2 0 ani h
SFX V2 0 e h
SFX V2 0 eera h
SFX V2 0 i h
SFX V2 0 uu h
SFX V2 0 uuf h
SFX V2 0 neerra h
SFX V2 0 aaf h
SFX V2 0 aas h
SFX V2 0 aatu h
SFX V2 0 uuttan h
SFX V2 0 uutti h
SFX V2 0 aa h
SFX V2 0 naan h
SFX V2 0 u h
SFX V2 0 eeti h
SFX V2 0 ees h
SFX V2 0 is h
SFX V2 0 uufan h
SFX V2 0 uufi h
SFX V2 0 uufii h
SFX V2 0 adhuu h
SFX V2 0 adhe h
SFX V2 0 amani h
SFX V2 0 ame h
SFX V2 0 amni h
SFX V2 0 amu h
SFX V2 0 amtu h
SFX V2 0 amtani h
SFX V2 0 amuu h
SFX V2 0 amuudha h
SFX V2 0 amuudhaaf h
SFX V2 0 amuun h
SFX V2 0 ullee h
SFX V2 0 aatii h
SFX V2 0 umsa h
SFX V2 0 iisa h
SFX V2 0 iinsa h

SFX V2 Y 80
SFX V2 0 achise '
SFX V2 0 achisa '
SFX V2 0 achisan '
SFX V2 0 achiste '
SFX V2 0 achisna '
SFX V2 0 achistan '
SFX V2 0 aniiru '
SFX V2 0 anna '
SFX V2 0 anne '
SFX V2 0 annu '
SFX V2 0 ata '
SFX V2 0 atani '
SFX V2 0 ate '
SFX V2 0 atte '
SFX V2 0 attu '
SFX V2 0 attan '
SFX V2 0 atu '
SFX V2 0 atan '
SFX V2 0 ta '
SFX V2 0 tani '
SFX V2 0 taniittu '
SFX V2 0 te '
SFX V2 0 teetta '
SFX V2 0 ti '
SFX V2 0 tu '
SFX V2 0 tuu '
SFX V2 0 a '
SFX V2 0 achuu '
SFX V2 0 achuuf '
SFX V2 0 adha '
SFX V2 0 adhe '
SFX V2 0 adhu '
SFX V2 0 ama '
SFX V2 0 amaa '
SFX V2 0 aman '
SFX V2 0 amne '
SFX V2 0 amoo '
SFX V2 0 amta '
SFX V2 0 amtan '
SFX V2 0 amte '
SFX V2 0 amti '
SFX V2 0 amtu '
SFX V2 0 amuuf '
SFX V2 0 ani '
SFX V2 0 e '
SFX V2 0 eera '
SFX V2 0 i '
SFX V2 0 uu '
SFX V2 0 uuf '
SFX V2 0 neerra '
SFX V2 0 aaf '
SFX V2 0 aas '
SFX V2 0 aatu '
SFX V2 0 uuttan '
SFX V2 0 uutti '
SFX V2 0 aa '
SFX V2 0 naan '
SFX V2 0 u '
SFX V2 0 eeti '
SFX V2 0 ees '
SFX V2 0 is '
SFX V2 0 uufan '
SFX V2 0 uufi '
SFX V2 0 uufii '
SFX V2 0 adhuu '
SFX V2 0 adhe '
SFX V2 0 amani '
SFX V2 0 ame '
SFX V2 0 amni '
SFX V2 0 amu '
SFX V2 0 amtu '
SFX V2 0 amtani '
SFX V2 0 amuu '
SFX V2 0 amuudha '
SFX V2 0 amuudhaaf '
SFX V2 0 amuun '
SFX V2 0 ullee '
SFX V2 0 aatii '
SFX V2 0 umsa '
SFX V2 0 iisa '
SFX V2 0 iinsa '


SFX V3 Y 67
SFX V3 0 da g
SFX V3 0 di g
SFX V3 0 dani g
SFX V3 0 de g
SFX V3 0 du g
SFX V3 0 sisa g
SFX V3 0 sisan g
SFX V3 0 sise g
SFX V3 0 siste g
SFX V3 0 sisna g
SFX V3 0 sistu g
SFX V3 0 sisne g
SFX V3 0 a g
SFX V3 0 achuu g
SFX V3 0 achuuf g
SFX V3 0 adha g
SFX V3 0 adhe g
SFX V3 0 adhu g
SFX V3 0 ama g
SFX V3 0 amaa g
SFX V3 0 aman g
SFX V3 0 amne g
SFX V3 0 amoo g
SFX V3 0 amta g
SFX V3 0 amtan g
SFX V3 0 amte g
SFX V3 0 amti g
SFX V3 0 amtu g
SFX V3 0 amuuf g
SFX V3 0 ani g
SFX V3 0 e g
SFX V3 0 eera g
SFX V3 0 i g
SFX V3 0 uu g
SFX V3 0 uuf g
SFX V3 0 neerra g
SFX V3 0 aaf g
SFX V3 0 aas g
SFX V3 0 aatu g
SFX V3 0 uuttan g
SFX V3 0 uutti g
SFX V3 0 aa g
SFX V3 0 naan g
SFX V3 0 u g
SFX V3 0 eeti g
SFX V3 0 ees g
SFX V3 0 is g
SFX V3 0 uufan g
SFX V3 0 uufi g
SFX V3 0 uufii g
SFX V3 0 adhuu g
SFX V3 0 adhe g
SFX V3 0 amani g
SFX V3 0 ame g
SFX V3 0 amni g
SFX V3 0 amu g
SFX V3 0 amtu g
SFX V3 0 amtani g
SFX V3 0 amuu g
SFX V3 0 amuudha g
SFX V3 0 amuudhaaf g
SFX V3 0 amuun g
SFX V3 0 ullee g
SFX V3 0 aatii g
SFX V3 0 umsa g
SFX V3 0 iisa g
SFX V3 0 iinsa g
SFX V3 0 ina g
SFX V3 0 ine g
SFX V3 0 inu g
SFX V3 0 amnaan g
SFX V3 0 ame g

SFX V3 0 anne g
SFX V3 0 anii g

SFX V3 Y 68
SFX V3 0 da d
SFX V3 0 di d
SFX V3 0 dani d
SFX V3 0 de d
SFX V3 0 du d
SFX V3 0 eenya d
SFX V3 0 sisa d
SFX V3 0 sisan d
SFX V3 0 sise d
SFX V3 0 siste d
SFX V3 0 sisna d
SFX V3 0 sistu d
SFX V3 0 sisne d
SFX V3 0 a d
SFX V3 0 achuu d
SFX V3 0 achuuf d
SFX V3 0 adha d
SFX V3 0 adhe d
SFX V3 0 adhu d
SFX V3 0 ama d
SFX V3 0 amaa d
SFX V3 0 aman d
SFX V3 0 amne d
SFX V3 0 amoo d
SFX V3 0 amta d
SFX V3 0 amtan d
SFX V3 0 amte d
SFX V3 0 amti d
SFX V3 0 amtu d
SFX V3 0 amuuf d
SFX V3 0 ani d
SFX V3 0 e d
SFX V3 0 eera d
SFX V3 0 i d
SFX V3 0 uu d
SFX V3 0 uuf d
SFX V3 0 neerra d
SFX V3 0 aaf d
SFX V3 0 aas d
SFX V3 0 aatu d
SFX V3 0 uuttan d
SFX V3 0 uutti d
SFX V3 0 aa d
SFX V3 0 naan d
SFX V3 0 u d
SFX V3 0 eeti d
SFX V3 0 ees d
SFX V3 0 is d
SFX V3 0 uufan d
SFX V3 0 uufi d
SFX V3 0 uufii d
SFX V3 0 adhuu d
SFX V3 0 adhe d
SFX V3 0 amani d
SFX V3 0 ame d
SFX V3 0 amni d
SFX V3 0 amu d
SFX V3 0 amtu d
SFX V3 0 amtani d
SFX V3 0 amuu d
SFX V3 0 amuudha d
SFX V3 0 amuudhaaf d
SFX V3 0 amuun d
SFX V3 0 ullee d
SFX V3 0 aatii d
SFX V3 0 umsa d
SFX V3 0 iisa d
SFX V3 0 iinsa d
